Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-807
Deputies; oath.

Each deputy shall take the same oath as the principal which shall be endorsed upon and filed with the certificate of appointment.

R.S.1866, c. 15, § 5, p. 127;

R.S.1913, § 5741;

C.S.1922, § 5070;

C.S.1929, § 84-807;

R.S.1943, § 84-807;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 55.

Under prior law no distinction is made between state and county officers under this section. Baker v. State, 112 Neb. 654, 200 N.W. 876 (1924).